Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,224
Special inspection; expenses; fee; report.

If at any time the owner or user of a conveyance desires a special inspection of a conveyance, it shall be made by the state elevator inspector after due request therefor and the inspector making the inspection shall collect his or her expenses in connection therewith and a fee established pursuant to section 81-5,214. A report of the inspection shall be provided to the owner or user who requested the inspection upon their request.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2515;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 60.
July 1, 2019